Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1194.
do enact as follows:AB1194,13Section 1. 125.06 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1194,2,24125.06 (6) Public parks. The sale of fermented malt alcohol beverages in any 5public park operated by a county or municipality. Fermented malt Alcohol 1beverages shall be sold by officers or employees of the county or municipality under 2an ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation enacted by the governing body.AB1194,23Section 2. 125.09 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1194,2,74125.09 (6) Municipal stores sales. No municipality may engage in the sale 5of alcohol beverages, except as authorized under s. ss. 125.06 (6) and 125.26 (6). 6This subsection does not apply to municipal stores in operation on November 6, 71969.AB1194,2,88